Colorado, session 2026A, SB115.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) It is the responsibility of the general assembly to establish
penalties for crimes, which often require long incarceration sentences to
punish and incapacitate persons convicted of serious offenses;
(b) While long sentences are appropriate and necessary in certain
cases, providing the opportunity for individuals in lower-risk populations
to be considered for sentence reduction based on demonstrated
rehabilitation after they have served decades in prison incentivizes positive
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

behavior and is consistent with public safety;
(c) Very lengthy sentences present significant public policy issues
that the general assembly must consider, including the ability of the state to
meet its constitutional requirement to provide medical care to the
incarcerated population and the fiscal cost of the state prison system;
(d) Persons who are over 60 years old and have been incarcerated
for more than 20 years present a significantly low risk to public safety and
disproportionately account for medical expenses and care utilization within
the prison system;
(e) The interests of justice are best served by providing to persons
who have aged out of risk to public safety the due process to have their
sentences reconsidered if they can provide evidence of their rehabilitation;
and
(f) Providing the person incarcerated, the prosecution, and any
victims of the crime the opportunity to be heard at a single public hearing
ensures a fair and transparent deliberative process and recognizes that hope
and change have a place in our criminal legal system.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 18-1.3-411 as
follows:
18-1.3-411. Post-conviction relief - sentence reconsideration -
offenders sixty years old or older.
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL SERVING A SENTENCE IN THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS MAY, ON OR BEFORE THREE YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THIS SECTION, FILE A PETITION WITH THE COURT WHERE THE CONVICTION
WAS OBTAINED REQUESTING POST-CONVICTION RELIEF FROM THE TERMS OF
THE SENTENCE IF THE PETITIONER IS SIXTY YEARS OLD OR OLDER AT THE
TIME OF FILING THE PETITION AND HAS SERVED AT LEAST TWENTY CALENDAR
YEARS INCARCERATED FOR THE OFFENSE RESULTING IN THE CONVICTION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR POST-CONVICTION RELIEF
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AS THE RESULT OF CONVICTION FOR ONE OF
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-115

THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES:
(a) A SEX OFFENSE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 16-11.7-102 (3);
(b) HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE PURSUANT
TO SECTION 18-3-503 OR HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-504;
(c) AN OFFENSE THAT RESULTED IN A SENTENCE TO LIFE
IMPRISONMENT WITHOUT THE POSSIBILITY OF PAROLE;
(d) AN OFFENSE FOR WHICH THE VICTIM WAS A CHILD YOUNGER
THAN TWELVE YEARS OLD; OR
(e) AN OFFENSE AGAINST A PEACE OFFICER, EMERGENCY MEDICAL
SERVICE PROVIDER, EMERGENCY MEDICAL CARE PROVIDER, OR FIREFIGHTER
ENGAGED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.
(3) (a) THE PETITIONER HAS A RIGHT TO COUNSEL FOR ALL
PROCEEDINGS ARISING FROM A PETITION FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
UPON RECEIPT OF A PRO SE PETITION REQUESTING POST-CONVICTION RELIEF,
THE COURT SHALL APPOINT COUNSEL FROM THE OFFICE OF STATE PUBLIC
DEFENDER TO REPRESENT THE PETITIONER. IF THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC
DEFENDER NOTIFIES THE COURT OF A CONFLICT OF INTEREST, THE COURT
SHALL APPOINT THE OFFICE OF ALTERNATE DEFENSE COUNSEL TO REPRESENT
THE PETITIONER.
(b) THE COURT SHALL GIVE COUNSEL APPOINTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION (3) THE OPPORTUNITY TO AMEND, SUPPLEMENT, OR
OTHERWISE FILE DOCUMENTS SUPPORTING THE PETITION. WITHIN ONE
HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS AFTER THE APPOINTMENT, APPOINTED COUNSEL
SHALL, AFTER REVIEW OF THE FACTS AND EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE
PETITION, ADVISE THE COURT IN WRITING WHETHER THE PETITIONER WISHES
TO PROCEED TO AN EVIDENTIARY HEARING ON THE PETITION OR WITHDRAW
THE PETITION AND REFILE THE PETITION AT A LATER DATE, SUBJECT TO THE
LIMITATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) IF THE PETITIONER REQUESTS A HEARING ON A PETITION FOR
POST-CONVICTION RELIEF FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL GRANT THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY TIME TO RESPOND IN WRITING TO THE
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-115

PETITION.
(5) (a) AFTER RECEIPT OF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S RESPONSE FILED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL, AS SOON
AS PRACTICABLE, SET A HEARING ON THE PETITION.
(b) A DEFENDANT IS ENTITLED TO ONLY ONE EVIDENTIARY HEARING
ON THE MERITS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. AFTER A DEFENDANT HAS HAD
AN EVIDENTIARY HEARING ON THE MERITS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE
DEFENDANT SHALL NOT FILE A SUBSEQUENT PETITION PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION.
(6) THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY SHALL NOTIFY THE VICTIM OF ANY
OFFENSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE "VICTIM RIGHTS ACT", PART 3 OF
ARTICLE 4.1 OF TITLE 24, AND THE COURT SHALL PROVIDE THE VICTIM AN
OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD AT THE HEARING.
(7) AT THE HEARING ON THE PETITION, THE PETITIONER HAS THE
BURDEN TO SHOW, BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, THAT THE
PETITIONER NO LONGER PRESENTS A DANGER TO THE SAFETY OF ANY PERSON
OR THE COMMUNITY AND THAT THERE IS GOOD CAUSE FOR THE COURT TO
MODIFY THE PETITIONER'S SENTENCE. THE COURT MAY ACCEPT ANY
STIPULATION OF THE PARTIES THAT THE PETITIONER HAS MET THEIR BURDEN
AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE
STIPULATION IS SUPPORTED BY THE EVIDENCE AS AGREED TO BY THE
PARTIES.
(8) AT THE HEARING ON THE PETITION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER
THE FOLLOWING FACTORS RELATED TO THE PETITIONER AND THE OFFENSE
THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE PETITION AND ADMIT ANY EVIDENCE RELEVANT
TO ANY OF THE FACTORS:
(a) THE PETITIONER'S AGE AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE AND THE
RELATIONSHIP OF AGE TO DIMINISHED CULPABILITY;
(b) THE PETITIONER'S AGE OF THE TIME OF THE HEARING AND THE
LIKELIHOOD OF REOFFENSE GIVEN THE CURRENT AGE OF THE PETITIONER;
(c) THE NATURE OF THE OFFENSE, THE EXTENT OF THE PETITIONER'S
ROLE IN THE OFFENSE, AND WHETHER AND TO WHAT EXTENT ANOTHER
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-115

PERSON WAS INVOLVED IN THE OFFENSE;
(d) THE CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PETITIONER AND THE PETITIONER'S
HISTORY, INCLUDING ANY HISTORY OF TRAUMA, ABUSE, INVOLVEMENT IN
THE CHILD WELFARE SYSTEM, OR OTHER MITIGATING CIRCUMSTANCES;
(e) THE PETITIONER'S COMPLIANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE
INSTITUTIONS IN WHICH THE PETITIONER HAS BEEN CONFINED,
PARTICULARLY WITHIN THE PRIOR FIVE YEARS;
(f) THE PETITIONER'S PARTICIPATION IN EDUCATIONAL, VOCATIONAL,
OR OTHER PROGRAMS OFFERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS OR
OTHER ENTITIES;
(g) THE HISTORY AND CHARACTERISTICS OF THE PETITIONER AT THE
TIME OF THE HEARING, INCLUDING DEMONSTRATED MATURITY, SUCCESSFUL
REHABILITATION, AND FITNESS TO REENTER SOCIETY SUFFICIENT TO JUSTIFY
A SENTENCE REDUCTION;
(h) A STATEMENT OR OTHER EVIDENCE OFFERED BY A VICTIM OR A
VICTIM'S REPRESENTATIVE, INCLUDING ANY EVIDENCE OF A CONTINUING
IMPACT OF THE CRIME ON THE VICTIM;
(i) A REPORT OF A PHYSICAL, MENTAL, OR BEHAVIORAL
EXAMINATION OF THE PETITIONER CONDUCTED BY A HEALTH PROFESSIONAL;
(j) WHETHER THE DEFENDANT HAS COMPLIED WITH CRIMINAL OR
CIVIL PROTECTION ORDERS; AND
(k) ANY OTHER FACTOR THE COURT DEEMS RELEVANT TO THE
COURT'S DETERMINATION OF WHETHER THE PETITIONER HAS MET THEIR
BURDEN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION.
(9) (a) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE PETITIONER HAS NOT MET
THEIR BURDEN DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL DENY THE PETITION AND SET FORTH THE REASONS FOR THE FINDING
IN ITS ORDER.
(b) UPON A FINDING THAT THE PETITIONER HAS MET THEIR BURDEN
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7) OF THIS SECTION, THE PETITIONER IS
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-115

PERMITTED TO FILE A MOTION FOR RECONSIDERATION AND REDUCTION OF
THE INITIAL SENTENCE PURSUANT TO RULE 35 (b) OF THE COLORADO RULES
OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE. THE MOTION IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE TIME LIMITS
CONTAINED IN RULE 35 (b) OF THE COLORADO RULES OF CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE AND MAY BE MADE ORALLY AT THE TIME OF THE HEARING OR
SUBMITTED IN WRITING WITHIN NINETY-ONE DAYS AFTER THE COURT'S
RULING.
(10) (a) AT THE HEARING ON THE PETITIONER'S MOTION FOR
RECONSIDERATION OF THE INITIAL SENTENCE PURSUANT TO RULE 35 (b) OF
THE COLORADO RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE, THE COURT SHALL
DETERMINE AND IMPOSE THE APPROPRIATE SENTENCE, WHICH MUST
INCLUDE, IF THE PETITIONER IS ELIGIBLE FOR RESENTENCING PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW, A SENTENCE TO IMPRISONMENT THAT TOTALS AT LEAST
TWENTY-FIVE YEARS BUT NO LONGER THAN ORIGINALLY IMPOSED BY THE
COURT, INCLUDING UP TO FIVE YEARS OF PAROLE; AN ALTERNATIVE
SENTENCE PERMITTED BY LAW, INCLUDING A COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS
DIRECT SENTENCE; OR A SENTENCE STIPULATED TO BY THE PARTIES; OR
(b) IF A PETITIONER IS ELIGIBLE FOR RESENTENCING AND IS SERVING
SENTENCES FOR MULTIPLE OFFENSES, THE COURT HAS THE DISCRETION TO
MODIFY A SENTENCE TO BE CONCURRENT WITH ANY OTHER SENTENCE
IMPOSED ON THE PETITIONER, AND THE MODIFIED SENTENCE IS NOT SUBJECT
TO THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 18-1.3-406.
(11) IF A PERSON IN THE CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR POST-CONVICTION RELIEF PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S OFFICE THAT PROSECUTED THE
OFFENSE RESULTING IN THE CONVICTION MAY PETITION THE COURT
REQUESTING THAT THE COURT GRANT POST-CONVICTION RELIEF TO THE
PERSON. IF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY FILES A PETITION DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (11), THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (3) TO (10) OF THIS
SECTION REGARDING THE APPOINTMENT OF COUNSEL, THE BURDEN OF
PROOF, THE RELEVANT EVIDENTIARY FACTORS, THE DUE PROCESS GRANTED
TO THE INCARCERATED PERSON, AND THE PROSECUTION AND ANY
STIPULATION OF THE PARTIES, APPLY. A DISTRICT ATTORNEY WHO FILES A
PETITION PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (11) MAY FILE A MOTION
REQUESTING THE COURT APPOINT COUNSEL FOR THE PERSON.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-115

(12) UPON THE REQUEST OF THE PETITIONER AND EXECUTION BY THE
PETITIONER OF ANY NECESSARY CONFIDENTIALITY WAIVERS, THE
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS SHALL PROVIDE THE PETITIONER OR THE
PETITIONER'S ATTORNEY OF RECORD WITH ANY INFORMATION IN THE
POSSESSION OF THE DEPARTMENT REQUESTED FOR THE PREPARATION OF THE
PETITION FOR POST-CONVICTION RELIEF, INCLUDING ALL TIME COMPUTATION
INFORMATION AVAILABLE FOR THE PETITIONER, INCLUDING ALL EARNED
TIME AWARDED AGAINST THE PETITIONER'S SENTENCE THAT WOULD BE
CREDITED AGAINST ANY NEW SENTENCE IMPOSED AND ANY RISK
ASSESSMENT SCORE PERTAINING TO THE PETITIONER.
(13) UPON THE REQUEST OF A PARTY, THE COURT SHALL GRANT
REASONABLE DISCOVERY DISCLOSURES TO THE PARTY TO EFFECTUATE FAIR
PREPARATION AND PRESENTATION OF RELEVANT EVIDENCE RELATED TO THE
FACTORS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (8) OF THIS SECTION IN ORDER TO
ENSURE A FAIR HEARING. THE COURT HAS THE DISCRETION TO ENTER ORDERS
TO CURE OR REMEDY A VIOLATION OF ANY DEADLINES OR OTHER DISCOVERY
REQUIREMENTS.
(14) BEGINNING IN JANUARY 2027, AND IN JANUARY EVERY YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE, AS PART OF ITS
PRESENTATION DURING ITS "SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY SECTION
2-7-203, SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF THE INFORMATION, THE
FOLLOWING:
(a) THE NUMBER OF PETITIONS FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION;
(b) THE NUMBER OF HEARINGS SET PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF
THIS SECTION;
(c) THE NUMBER OF SENTENCES DETERMINED AND IMPOSED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (10) OF THIS SECTION;
(d) THE AVERAGE HOURLY LENGTH OF THE HEARINGS HELD
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION;
(e) WHETHER VICTIM INPUT WAS PROVIDED IN CONSIDERATION OF
EACH MATTER FILED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION; AND
(f) FOR EACH CASE IN WHICH THE COURT GRANTED A PETITION
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-115

PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE UNDERLYING OFFENSE AND THE RISK LEVEL
OF THE PETITIONER AS DETERMINED BY A RISK ASSESSMENT COMPLETED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (12) OF THIS SECTION, WHETHER VICTIMS CHOSE
TO PARTICIPATE IN THE EVIDENTIARY HEARING, WHETHER THE PROSECUTOR
WAS ABLE TO LOCATE ANY VICTIMS, WHETHER THE ORIGINAL SENTENCE WAS
THE RESULT OF A PLEA AGREEMENT OR A JURY VERDICT AND
COURT-IMPOSED SENTENCE, AND HOW MANY MONTHS WERE REMAINING ON
THE ORIGINAL SENTENCE.
SECTION 3. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$50,840 is appropriated to the judicial department for use by the office of
the state public defender. This appropriation is from the general fund. To
implement this act, the office may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $42,600 for personal services, which amount is based on an
assumption that the office will require an additional 0.5 FTE; and
(b) $8,240 for use by the office of the state public defender for
operating expenses.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $50,326 is appropriated to the
department of corrections for use by community services. This
appropriation is from the General Fund. To implement this act, the
department may use this appropriation for the wrap-around services
program.
SECTION 4. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill. To
implement this act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of corrections for use by management for payments to local jails at a rate of
$77.16 per inmate per day is decreased by $168,980.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3)
of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or
part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-115

held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to individuals convicted of an offense before,
on, or after the applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-115